Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1235
Subpoena; nonresident witness; immunity from service of summons.

A witness shall not be liable to be sued in a county in which he does not reside, by being served with a summons in such county, while going, returning or attending in obedience to a subpoena.

R.S.1867, Code § 363, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 7927;

C.S.1922, § 8869;

C.S.1929, § 20-1235;

R.S.1943, § 25-1235.

Nonresident is privileged from service while coming to, going from, and attending trial; and has reasonable time to prepare for his return. Linton v. Cooper, 54 Neb. 438, 74 N.W. 842 (1898), judgment affirmed in 54 Neb. 443, 74 N.W. 961 (1898).

Exemption is a personal privilege which may be waived. Mayer v. Nelson, 54 Neb. 434, 74 N.W. 841 (1898).